Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-329
Paid-up capital stock, defined.

For purposes of sections
21-301 to 21-330, the term paid-up capital stock shall mean, at
any particular time, the sum of the par value of all shares of capital stock
of the corporation issued and outstanding.

Laws 1984, LB 800, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 202;

Laws 1999, LB 35, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 260.
January 1, 2016